Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.060

Application, examination—Fees.

Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for applications and examinations shall be established as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 64; 1991 c 3 s 197; 1984 c 279 s 79; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 72; 1965 c 70 s 6; 1955 c 305 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.